Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 22

State Owned Motor Vehicle Fleets

4-22-101. Plans to reduce use of petroleum products.

All state agencies, universities, and community colleges that have state owned motor vehicle fleets consisting of more than ten (10) motor vehicles shall develop and implement plans to increase the state's use of alternative fuels, synthetic lubricants, and energy-efficient motor vehicle or low-emission vehicles. Each entity's plan shall have a goal of reducing or displacing at least twenty percent (20%) of the current petroleum products consumed by each entity's motor vehicle fleet by January 1, 2015. All entities shall initiate plan implementation by January 1, 2014.

Reductions may be met by displacing the use of petroleum or oils through the use of biodiesel, ethanol, synthetic oils or lubricants, or other alternative fuels; the use of hybrid electric vehicles, natural gas vehicles, propane vehicles or other energy-efficient motor vehicle or low-emission vehicles; or additional methods that reduce harmful emissions as may be approved by the department of general services, thereby reducing the amount of harmful emissions.

No plan shall impede mission fulfillment of the entity and every plan shall allow for changes in vehicle usage and total miles driven and provide exceptions for technological or budgetary limitations and emergencies. Technological exceptions may include, but not be limited to, that the entity's vehicles will be operating primarily in an area in which there is no refueling station established for alternative fuels.

For purposes of this section:

“Energy-efficient motor vehicle” means a passenger motor vehicle that is:

An alternative fuel vehicle as defined by the Energy Policy Act of 1992 (P.L. 102-486);

A flexible fuel vehicle (FFV) utilizing ethanol, biodiesel, or any other commercially available alternative fuel approved by the United States department of energy;

A hybrid-electric vehicle (HEV);

A compact fuel-efficient vehicle, defined as a vehicle powered by unleaded gasoline that has a United States EPA estimated highway gasoline mileage rating of at least twenty-five miles per gallon (25 mpg) or greater for the model year purchased;

An electric vehicle (EV);

A vehicle powered by natural gas or propane; or

A vehicle powered by ultra low sulfur diesel fuel that meets Bin 5, Tier II emission standards mandated by the EPA and that has an EPA estimated highway mileage rating of at least thirty miles per gallon (30 mpg) or greater for the model year purchased; and

“Motor vehicle” means a self-propelled vehicle licensed for highway use.

Acts 2007, ch. 489, § 1; 2013, ch. 228, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 423, §§ 3, 6; 2014, ch. 591, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 423, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Energy Independence Act of 2013.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning alternative fuel vehicles and fueling infrastructure, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 423.

4-22-102. Modified vehicles.

If an entity has, as part of the entity's motor vehicle fleet, motor vehicles that have been modified from the vehicles' original construction for an educational, emergency services, or public safety use or motor vehicles that are used for emergency services or law enforcement purposes, then the entity shall provide for a reduction or displacement of at least ten percent (10%) of the current petroleum products consumed by those motor vehicles in the entity's reduction and displacement plan.

Acts 2007, ch. 489, § 2.